Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.035

Citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences.

(1) The citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences is created.

(2) The commission has seven members as follows:

(a) One member is the state auditor, who is a nonvoting member;

(b) One member is the chair of the joint legislative audit and review committee, who is a nonvoting member;

(c) The chair of each of the two largest caucuses of the senate and the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives shall each appoint a member. None of these appointees may be members of the legislature; and

(d) The governor shall select the seventh member.

(3) Persons appointed by the caucus chairs should be individuals who represent a balance of perspectives and constituencies, and have a basic understanding of state tax policy, government operations, and public services. These appointees should have knowledge and expertise in performance management, fiscal analysis, strategic planning, economic development, performance assessments, or closely related fields.

(4) The commission shall elect a chair from among its voting or nonvoting members. Decisions of the commission must be made using the sufficient consensus model. For the purposes of this subsection, "sufficient consensus" means the point at which the vast majority of the commission favors taking a particular action. If the commission determines that sufficient consensus cannot be reached, a vote must be taken. The commission must allow a minority report to be included with a decision of the commission, if requested by a member of the commission.

(5) Members serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the initial terms, the members appointed by the chairs of senate caucuses shall serve four-year terms, the members appointed by the chairs of house of representatives caucuses shall serve three-year terms, and the member appointed by the governor shall serve a two-year term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.

(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide clerical, technical, and management personnel to the commission to serve as the commission's staff. The department of revenue shall provide necessary support and information to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(7) The commission shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of the members of the commission. The members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2006 c 197 s 3.]